Utah statutes.
40-8-8.   Board authority to act -- Entry of order -- Confidential data.

(1)  The board may:

(a)  file a notice of agency action; or

(b)  respond to a request for agency action initiated by an affected person.

(2) (a)  The board shall enter its order within 60 days after the hearing.

(b)  All orders entered by the board shall be:

(i)  entered in books to be kept by the board for that purpose;

(ii)  indexed; and

(iii)  public records open for inspection at all times during reasonable office hours.

(c)  Confidential data disclosed under this chapter shall be protected and not become public records, except as provided in Section 40-8-13.

